Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.090

Counties authorized to build, improve, operate and maintain, etc., parks, playgrounds, gymnasiums, swimming pools, beaches, stadiums, golf courses, etc., and other recreational facilities—Regulation—Charges for use.

Any county, acting through its board of county commissioners, is empowered to build, construct, care for, control, supervise, improve, operate and maintain parks, playgrounds, gymnasiums, swimming pools, field houses, bathing beaches, stadiums, golf courses, automobile racetracks and drag strips, coliseums for the display of spectator sports, public campgrounds, boat ramps and launching sites, public hunting and fishing areas, arboretums, bicycle and bridle paths, and other recreational facilities, and to that end may make, promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations regarding the use thereof, and make such charges for the use thereof, as may be deemed by said board to be reasonable.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 144: See note following RCW 36.900.030.

Authority to establish park and playground systems: RCW 36.68.010.

Stadiums, powers of cities and counties to acquire and operate: Chapter 67.28 RCW.